incubator/apertium-eng-lvs/apertium-eng-lvs.lvs.dix
    <pardef n="manēj/s__prn">
      <e><p><l>s</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>am</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ā</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ā</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>i</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ām</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ās</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ais</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ā</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajam</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajā</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ā</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ās</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajā</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajiem</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajos</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ās</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajām</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ās</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajās</l><r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/as__prn">
      <e><p><l>as</l><r><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ā</l><r><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>am</l><r><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ur</l><r><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/as__prn_itg">
      <e><p><l></l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r></p><par n="k/as__prn"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nek/as__prn_neg">
      <e><p><l></l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="k/as__prn"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="jebk/as__prn_ind">
      <e><p><l></l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="k/as__prn"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="ab/i__det">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iem</l><r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ām</l><r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ās</l><r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="nekas"><i>nek</i><par n="nek/as__prn_neg"/></e>
    <e lm="manējs"><i>manēj</i><par n="manēj/s__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tavējs"><i>tavēj</i><par n="manēj/s__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="savējs"><i>savēj</i><par n="manēj/s__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="viņējs"><i>viņēj</i><par n="manēj/s__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="jūsējs"><i>jūsēj</i><par n="manēj/s__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="kas"><i>k</i><par n="k/as__prn_itg"/></e>
    <e lm="jebkas"><i>jebk</i><par n="jebk/as__prn_ind"/></e>
    <e lm="kas"><i>k</i><par n="jebk/as__prn_ind"/></e>
    <e lm="kaut kas"><i>kaut<b/>k</i><par n="jebk/as__prn_ind"/></e>
    <e lm="abi"><i>ab</i><par n="ab/i__det"/></e>
